Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-368
Nonresident; nonresident licensed vehicles hauling grain or seasonally harvested products; reciprocity.

Sections 60-367 and 60-3,112 shall be operative as to motor vehicles or trailers owned by a nonresident of this state only to the extent that under the laws of the foreign country, state, territory, or federal district of his or her residence, like exemptions and privileges are guaranteed to motor vehicles or trailers duly registered under the laws of and owned by residents of this state or to a motor vehicle or trailer duly licensed in the state of residence and operated by a nonresident agricultural worker, certified by the Department of Labor, as engaged in temporary agricultural employment in this state, for a period of not to exceed sixty days.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 68.